Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1020
Attachment; receiver; appointment; notice to debtors of defendant in attachment; effect.

Such receiver shall forthwith give notice of his appointment to the persons indebted to the defendant in attachment. The notice shall be written or printed, and shall be served on the debtor or debtors by copy personally or by copy left at the residence. From the date of such service the debtors shall stand liable to the plaintiff in attachment for the amount of money and credits in their hands, or due from them to the defendant in attachment, and shall account therefor to the receiver.

R.S.1867, Code § 215, p. 428;

R.S.1913, § 7749;

C.S.1922, § 8693;

C.S.1929, § 20-1020;

R.S.1943, § 25-1020.